South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Local ordinances or regulations for architectural review of commercial properties in this State may not be enforced until July 1, 2028. The provisions of this joint resolution: (1) apply notwithstanding the provisions of Article 5, Chapter 29, Title 6, or another provision of law; and (2) do not apply to single-family residences. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----